lexc-files/derivational-suffixes/verb-suffixing/verb-derivSuffix_semiFinalE.txt
!======================================================
LEXICON VerbPostbaseVII
!  verb-elaborating [VV] and nominalizing [VN] suffixes
!  when suffixing to verb roots that have semifinal -e
!======================================================

0:0 NegationVII;

^~sf–ghhaleg(V→XCLM):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}ghhalek           #;               ! how V! (exclamation)

^–ghllagu(V→V):^%{.m.%}ghllagu                         VerbPostbaseI;   ! to be very V; to be busy V-ing
^@laataqu(V→V):^laataqu                                VerbPostbaseI;   ! to luckily have V-ed well
^–llgu(V→V):^%{.m.%}llgu                               VerbPostbaseI;   ! to V well 
^@~f–neghtu(V→V):^%{.m.%}neghtu                        VerbPostbaseI;   ! to V habitually; to V frequently
^~fnga(V→V):^nga                                       VerbPostbaseI;   ! to be in a state of V or of having V-ed
^~%:(ng)u(V→V):^%{.sf.%}u                              VerbPostbaseI;   ! to be V-ing; to be V-habitually or as an occupation; while in the process of V-ing
^@–nqegsi(V→V):^%{.m.%}nqegsi                          VerbPostbaseI;   ! to be good with respect to V-ing
^–pigu(V→V):^%{.m.%}pigu                               VerbPostbaseI;   ! to be so V
^–qaqu(V→V):^%{.m.%}qaqu                               VerbPostbaseI;   ! to V intermittently
^–qu(V→V):^%{.m.%}qu                                   VerbPostbaseI;   ! to repeatedly V 
^+tu(V→V):^tu                                          VerbPostbaseI;   ! to V habitually
^–tu(V→V):^%{.m.%}tu                                   VerbPostbaseI;   ! to V habitually
^+tulli(V→V):^tulli                                    VerbPostbaseI;   ! for it to be getting feasible to go V-ing b
^+tutka(V→V):^tutka                                    VerbPostbaseI;   ! to be V to an indicated degree
^@~f–yu(V→V):^%{.m.%}yu                                VerbPostbaseI;   ! to be good at V-ing; to generally V well
^@~fyuguma(V→V):^yuguma                                VerbPostbaseI;   ! to be easy to V
^@~fyuneghtu(V→V):^yuneghtu                            VerbPostbaseI;   ! to love to V
^~i(V→V):^%{.sf.%}i                                    VerbPostbaseI;   ! to V something; to suffer something's V-ing
^––iqe(V→V):^%{.mm.%}iqe                               VerbPostbaseII;  ! to have trouble with one's V-ing over a period of time
^–lgutke(V→V):^%{.m.%}lgutke                           VerbPostbaseII;  ! to V together with; to help (object) V
^–llgilliqe(V→V):^%{.m.%}llgilliqe                     VerbPostbaseII;  ! to experience trouble in V-ing 
^+lliqe(V→V):^lliqe                                    VerbPostbaseII;  ! to have trouble V-ing
^–lliqe(V→V):^%{.m.%}lliqe                             VerbPostbaseII;  ! to have trouble V-ing
^@~fnanighqe(V→V):^nanighqe                            VerbPostbaseII;  ! to make one cease V-ing
^@~fnaqutke(V→V):^naqutke                              VerbPostbaseII;  ! to try to V (it)
^@~fnatke(V→V):^natke                                  VerbPostbaseII;  ! to use or have (it) in order to V
^~–qaghaqe(V→V):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}qaghaqe                VerbPostbaseII;  ! to intermittently V; to V now and then
^@~%:(u)tke(V→V):^%{.sf.%}utke                         VerbPostbaseII;  ! to V over or on account of
^@~fvike(V→V):^vike                                    VerbPostbaseII;  ! to have as a place or as object of one's V-ing
^@~f–yiilliqe(V→V):^%{.m.%}yiilliqe                    VerbPostbaseII;  ! to have trouble V-ing
^@~fmiqe(CmpdVbl):^miqe                                VerbPostbaseII;  ! to compel one to V; to make one V
^+qe(V→V):^qe                                          VerbPostbaseII;  ! to act on so as to cause to V
^~sf%:(e)sqe(CmpdVbl):^%{.sf.%}esqe                    VerbPostbaseII;  ! to ask one to V; to tell one to V
^+te(V→V):^%{t%}e                                      VerbPostbaseII;  ! to act on so as to cause to V
^–ghllag(V→V):^%{.m.%}ghllag                           VerbPostbaseIII; ! to V or be V in a big way; to V for a long time
^–ghraag(V→V):^%{.m.%}ghraag                           VerbPostbaseIII; ! to do some V-ing; to gradually V; to get V-er; to be somewhat V
^–llaag(V→V):^%{.m.%}llaag                             VerbPostbaseIII; ! to V in a crude or clumsy way; crude one V-s
^+llug(V→V):^llug                                      VerbPostbaseIII; ! to V in an undesirable or bad way; for undesirable or bad one to V
^–llug(V→V):^%{.m.%}llug                               VerbPostbaseIII; ! to V in an undesirable or bad way; for undesirable or bad one to V
^–msug(V→V):^%{.m.%}msug                               VerbPostbaseIII; ! to casually V; to nonchalantly V
^@~f–neghllug(V→V):^%{.m.%}neghllug                    VerbPostbaseIII; ! to V wrongly or with difficulty
^+pag(V→V):^pag                                        VerbPostbaseIII; ! to V in a big way; to V intensively; to V excessively
^–pag(V→V):^%{.m.%}pag                                 VerbPostbaseIII; ! to V in a big way; to V intensively; to V excessively
^–pagllag(V→V):^%{.m.%}pagllag                         VerbPostbaseIII; ! to V too much, so much, intensively, excessively
^–pigllag(V→V):^%{.m.%}pigllag                         VerbPostbaseIII; ! to really, really V; to V all the way 
^–qrug(V→V):^%{.m.%}qrug                               VerbPostbaseIII; ! for troublesome one to V 
^+raag(V→V):^raag                                      VerbPostbaseIII; ! to do some V-ing; to kind of, but not exactly
^+saag(V→V):^saag                                      VerbPostbaseIII; ! to V in a strange way; to V weirdly
^–saag(V→V):^%{.m.%}saag                               VerbPostbaseIII; ! to V in a strange way; to V weirdly
^~f–vag(V→V):^%{.m.%}vag                               VerbPostbaseIII; ! to V in a big way; to V hard; to V intensely
^@~f–yaag(V→V):^%{.m.%}yaag                            VerbPostbaseIII; ! to V in a strange way; to V weirdly
^@~fyug(V→V):^yug                                      VerbPostbaseIII; ! to want to V; to tend toward V-ing; to feel V
^+(te)stepag(CmpdVbl):^testepag                        VerbPostbaseIII; ! to cause or allow one to V too much
^+(te)sug(CmpdVbl):^tesug                              VerbPostbaseIII; ! to want one to V
^–qiinagh(V→V):^%{.m.%}qiinagh                         VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to just V; to V just now; to only V (and perhaps in vain)
^~aghtagh(V→V):^%{.sf.%}aghtagh                        VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V repeatedly with back and forth movement
^~aatagh(V→V):^%{.sf.%}aatagh                          VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V finally or repeatedly and persistently, several times
^~(at)aghagh(V→V):^%{.sf.%}ataghagh                    VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to be V-er; to V more; to be more V
^–ghrukutaagh(V→V):^%{.m.%}ghrukutaagh                 VerbPostbaseIV;  ! for very large, huge one to V 
^~–(ghw/ngw/w)aagh(V→V):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}waagh          VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to diligently V; to thoroughly V; to V at the proper time; to V attentively
^~fiiraagh(V→V):^iiraagh                               VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to play at V-ing; to keep on V-ing
^@~%:(i/u)manginagh(V→V):^%{.sf.%}umanginagh           VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V continuously, all the time; to keep V-ing 
^~–kanigh(V→V):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}kanigh                  VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to be rather V; to be fairly V; to V more and more
^~–kataghagh(V→V):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}kataghagh            VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to finally V despite a feeling that it wouldn't happen; to V at last
^–kestagh(V→V):^%{.m.%}kestagh                         VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V ahead of time; to V patiently; to V slowly; to V peacefully; to V leisurely; to start V-ing (for seasons and atmospheric phenomena)
^–kusiigh(V→V):^%{.m.%}kusiigh                         VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to casually V; to slowly V
^@~flaatagh(V→V):^laatagh                              VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V again; to V more; to V anyway
^@–lghaghtugh(V→V):^%{.m.%}lghaghtugh                  VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V already, unexpectedly, surprisingly
^–lgusigh(V→V):^%{.m.%}lgusigh                         VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V together with; to help (object) V
^–llegagh(V→V):^%{.m.%}llegagh                         VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V crudely
^–lqinagh(V→V):^%{.m.%}lqinagh                         VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V for a long time
^–lqiinagh(V→V):^%{.m.%}lqiinagh                       VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V for a long time
^–lqusiigh(V→V):^%{.m.%}lqusiigh                       VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V a little; little one V-s
^@lugh(V→V):^lugh                                      VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V angrily
^–mlaagh(V→V):^%{.m.%}mlaagh                           VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V a little
^–mraagh(V→V):^%{.m.%}mraagh                           VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V a little
^–mzaagh(V→V):^%{.m.%}mzaagh                           VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V a little
^–mleghagh(V→V):^%{.m.%}mleghagh                       VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V a little
^–mreghagh(V→V):^%{.m.%}mreghagh                       VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V a little
^–mzegagh(V→V):^%{.m.%}mzegagh                         VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V a little
^–vlaagh(V→V):^%{.m.%}vlaagh                           VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V a little
^–vleghagh(V→V):^%{.m.%}vleghagh                       VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V a little
^–msiigh(V→V):^%{.m.%}msiigh                           VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V ineffectively or without putting effort into it; to V under conditions of hardship
^@~fnagh(V→V):^nagh                                    VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to cause V-ing
^@~fnanigh(V→V):^nanigh                                VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to cease V-ing; to stop V-ing; to quit V-ing
^@~fnaqelqusiigh(V→V):^naqelqusiigh                    VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to stall or delay at V-ing.
^@~fnasiigh(V→V):^nasiigh                              VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to put off V-ing; to stall at V-ing; to V angrily
^@~f–neghsigh(V→V):^%{.m.%}neghsigh                    VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to wait for (it) to V; to wait for (it) to be V or to become V
^–ngeltagh(V→V):^%{.m.%}ngeltagh                       VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V in a small way
^–ngertagh(V→V):^%{.m.%}ngertagh                       VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V in a small way
^–ngestagh(V→V):^%{.m.%}ngestagh                       VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V in a small way
^%:(ng)inagh(V→V):^inagh                               VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to only V; to go right on V-ing
^–ngllagh(V→V):^%{.m.%}ngllagh                         VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to endeavor to induce one to V; to make one V
^@~fniigh(V→V):^niigh                                  VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to hunt by means of V-ing; to carry out the process of V-ing
^@–nqegsagh(V→V):^%{.m.%}nqegsagh                      VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V completely, correctly, thoroughly
^~f(p/v)agaatagh(V→V):^pagaatagh                       VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V repeatedly and hard
^–pagnanigh(V→V):^%{.m.%}pagnanigh                     VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to cease V-ing too much; to quit V-ing too much
^–pestaagh(V→V):^%{.m.%}pestaagh                       VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to truly V
^–pigagh(V→V):^%{.m.%}pigagh                           VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to be V exaclty (location)
^–pigesnagh(V→V):^%{.m.%}pigesnagh                     VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V in vain; to V for naught; to finally V
^~–qagh(V→V):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}qagh                      VerbPostbaseIV;  ! please V; just V; suddenly V; briefly
^~–qaghtagh(V→V):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}qaghtagh              VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to continuously V with back and forth or up and down movement
^–qragh(V→V):^%{.m.%}qragh                             VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to do fancy V-ing; to V a new thing
^@qugh(V→V):^qugh                                      VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V all things available; to V completely
^–raaghinagh(V→V):^%{.m.%}raaghinagh*                  VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to only V; to do nothing but V (ironically?) 
